North Carolina, session 2025, HB1222.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. S.L. 2019-99 is repealed.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding G.S. 160D-803(c), the Brunswick County Board of
Commissioners shall make the final decision on all preliminary subdivision plats that would
result in the division of the original lot into twenty-five or more lots.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any provision of G.S. 160D-705 to the contrary, the
Brunswick County Board of Commissioners shall hear and make the final decision on all special
use permits.
SECTION 4. Brunswick County shall require a traffic impact analysis to be
submitted in conjunction with an application for (i) a preliminary subdivision plat that would
result in the division of the original lot into twenty-five or more lots, (ii) a major site plan, (iii) a
special use permit, (iv) a planned development, and (v) all other residential or commercial
projects reasonably anticipated to generate at least 100 vehicle trips at peak hour or 1,000 vehicle
trips per day. The Brunswick County Planning Director shall present all traffic impact analyses
submitted in conjunction with an application before the Brunswick County Board of
Commissioners in open session at the next regularly scheduled meeting of the Board of
Commissioners following receipt of the traffic impact analysis. If the Board of Commissioners
is required to make the final decision on the project, the Board shall hear the Planning Director's
presentation prior to voting on the project.
SECTION 5. The Brunswick County Board of Commissioners shall make final
decisions on zoning ordinance text amendments, zoning map amendments, preliminary
subdivision plats, variances subject to approval by the Board, and special use permits by a
recorded vote taken in open session and the official record of the meeting shall reflect how each
member voted on each matter before the Board of Commissioners.
SECTION 6. This act applies only to the use and development of land and structures
located in Brunswick County outside of the land use and zoning jurisdiction of municipalities
located in Brunswick County.
*H1222-v-3*

SECTION 7. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to applications
submitted on or after that date.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 2nd day of July, 2026.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Destin Hall
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Page 2 Session Law 2026-30 House Bill 1222